Hawaii statutes.
§832-3 Form of demand. No demand for
the extradition of a person charged with crime in any state shall be recognized
by the governor unless in writing alleging, except in cases arising under
section 832-6, that the accused was present in the demanding state at the time
of the commission of the alleged crime, and that thereafter the accused fled
from the state, and accompanied by a copy of an indictment found or by
information supported by affidavit in the state having jurisdiction of the
crime, or by a copy of an affidavit made before a magistrate there, together
with a copy of any warrant which was issued thereupon; or by a copy of a
judgment of conviction or of a sentence imposed in execution thereof, together
with a statement by the executive authority of the demanding state that the
person claimed has escaped from confinement or has broken the terms of the
person's bail, probation, or parole. The indictment, information, or affidavit
made before the magistrate must substantially charge the person demanded with
having committed a crime under the law of that state; and the copy of
indictment, information, affidavit, judgment of conviction, or sentence must be
authenticated by the executive authority making the demand. [L 1941, c 99, §3;
RL 1945, §10633; RL 1955, §250-3; HRS §713-3; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next